Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.160

Transportation improvement projects—Material change policy—Annual report.

(1) The district governing body shall develop a material change policy to address major plan changes that affect project delivery or the ability to finance the plan. The policy must at least address material changes to cost, scope, and schedule, the level of change that will require governing body involvement, and how the governing body will address those changes. At a minimum, in the event that a transportation improvement cost exceeds its original cost by more than twenty percent as identified in a district's original finance plan, the governing body shall hold a public hearing to solicit comment from the public regarding how the cost change should be resolved.

(2) A district shall issue an annual report, indicating the status of transportation improvement costs, transportation improvement expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules, to the public and to newspapers of record in the district.

[ 2005 c 336 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.